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DI9FZ-02

DTC P 1520/52Stop Light Switch Signal Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This signal is used to detect when the brakes have been applied. The STP signal voltage is the same as
the voltage supplied to the stop lamps.

The STP signalis used mainly to control the fuel cut -offengine speed (thefuelcut -offenginespeedisre-
duced slightly when the vehicle is braking).
DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area
The STP signal does not turn off even once the vehicle is driv- « Shortin stop lamp switch signal circuit
P1520/52 en « Stop lamp switch
(1 trip detectionlogic) *EngineECU
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WIRING DIAGRAM

S6 Engine ECU
Stop Lamp Switch J/B No. 4 ( )
B_R R 13 9 12
o —G 4E 4C }B=C(E1g) sT1-
1
. Cowl Side JJBRH* 5
J/B No. 4 CowlSide J/BLH Cowl Side J/BLH*
15( 4E GW35 2GGW4 5 GW19
\OJ—(;-;— 2D 2E 1 ———(E18)
zm ] 8] STP
B \
9 (4D 35 (2K 2M*, 2M*,
3M* 3M*
G-R l
B-R Stop Lamp
Cowl Side
J/B RH
8( 3E) (2D) 31
IGN S S STOP | CowlSide J/BLH
4( 3E) ( 2C) 1
] B-G
J/B
NO.2| F3s
Fusible Link Block
ALT
A
Ignition Switch B
- Ed
Battery | 1 1 | Battery
- - 1
1 I *:RHD
*:LHD
I __
P A23872

1HD-FTVENGINESUP (RM 1179E)



DI-115
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Read freeze frame data using the intelligent tester Il. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, and other data from the time the malfunction oc-
curred.

1 Check operation of stop lamp.

CHECK:
Check if the stop lamps go on and off normally when the brake pedal is depressed and released.

@

2 | Check STP signal.

NG> Check and repair stop lamp circuit.

When using intelligent tester II:

Brake Pedal Brake Pedal PREPARATION: ) )

Depressed Released (@ Connect the intelligent tester Il to the DLCS.

(b)  Turnthe ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester
[l main switch ON.

CHECK:
Read the STP signal on the intelligent tester II.
OK:
Brake Pedal STP Signal
Depressed ON
Released OFF
When not using intelligent tester II:
PREPARATION:

Turn the ignition switch ON.

\w( \yﬁ/ W CHECK:
Check the voltage between terminal STP of the engine ECU

i
i
=

STP connector and body ground.
OK:
Y A23889
Brake Pedal Voltage
Depressed 7.5t0 14V
Released Below 1.5V

DI-4).

0K> Check for intermittent problems (See page
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3Ch

eck stop lamp switch (See Pub No. RM6

16E2,page BE -58)

e )

Replace or replace stop lamp switch.

@

Check harness and connector between engine ECU and stop lamp switch (See

page IN-19).

e )

Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).
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